Mississippi statutes. Title 17. Local Government; Provisions Common to Counties and Municipalities
Financing Provisions

§ 17-1-37.
Financing provisions.

The governing authorities of each municipality and county may set aside, appropriate and expend moneys from the general fund to finance the provisions of Sections 17-1-1 through 17-1-27, inclusive.

The governing authorities of each municipality and county may set aside, appropriate and expend moneys from the general fund to finance the provisions of Sections 17-1-31 through 17-1-35, inclusive.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2890.5, 2890.5-05; Laws, 1956, ch. 197, §§ 1-6; Laws, 1960, ch. 402; Laws, 1964, ch. 501, § 5; Laws, 1985, ch. 536, § 4; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 2, eff from and after October 1, 1986.